New York, session 2025-2026, S7287.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 17 of subsection (a) of section 3221 of the 2 insurance law, as amended by chapter 29 of the laws of 2023, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (17) [Space shall be provided] Every policy delivered or issued for 5 delivery in this state which provides major medical or similar compre- 6 hensive-type coverage shall provide space on any enrollment, renewal or 7 initial online portal process setup forms required of an insured or 8 applicant for insurance so that the insured or applicant for insurance 9 shall register or decline registration in the donate life registry for 10 organ, eye and tissue donations under this section of the enrollment, 11 renewal or initial online portal process setup forms and that the 12 following is stated on the form in clear and conspicuous type: 13 "You must fill out the following section: Would you like to be added 14 to the Donate Life Registry? Check box for 'yes' or 'skip this ques- 15 tion'." 16 § 2. Paragraph 15 of subsection (c) of section 3216 of the insurance 17 law, as added by chapter 29 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 (15) [Space shall be provided] Every policy delivered or issued for 20 delivery in this state which provides major medical or similar compre- 21 hensive-type coverage shall provide space on any enrollment, renewal or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11440-02-5 S. 7287--A 2 1 initial online portal process setup forms required of an insured or 2 applicant for insurance, except forms issued by the NY State of Health, 3 the official Health Plan Marketplace, other than those specifically 4 referenced in subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (a) of subdivision five of 5 section [four thousand three] forty-three hundred ten and paragraph (v) 6 of subdivision one of section two hundred six of the public health law, 7 required of an insured or applicant for insurance so that the insured or 8 applicant shall register or decline registration in the donate life 9 registry for organ, eye and tissue donations under this section of the 10 enrollment or renewal form and that the following is stated on the form 11 in clear and conspicuous type: 12 "You must fill out the following section: Would you like to be added 13 to the Donate Life Registry? Check box for 'yes' or 'skip this ques- 14 tion'." 15 § 3. Subsection (o) of section 4306 of the insurance law, as amended 16 by chapter 29 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 17 (o) [Space shall be provided] Every contract delivered or issued for 18 delivery in this state which provides major medical or similar compre- 19 hensive-type coverage shall provide space on any enrollment, renewal or 20 initial online portal process setup forms required of a subscriber or 21 applicant for coverage, except forms issued by the NY State of Health, 22 the official Health Plan Marketplace, other than those specifically 23 referenced in subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (a) of subdivision five of 24 section [forty three] forty-three hundred ten and paragraph (v) of 25 subdivision one of section two hundred six of the public health law, so 26 that the subscriber or applicant for coverage shall register or decline 27 registration in the donate life registry for organ, eye and tissue 28 donations under this section of the enrollment, renewal or initial 29 online portal process setup forms and that the following is stated on 30 the form in clear and conspicuous type: 31 "You must fill out the following section: Would you like to be added 32 to the Donate Life Registry? Check box for 'yes' or 'skip this ques- 33 tion'." 34 § 4. Subdivision 8 of section 4408 of the public health law, as 35 amended by chapter 29 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 36 follows: 37 8. [Space shall be provided] Every contract delivered or issued for 38 delivery in this state which provides major medical or similar compre- 39 hensive-type coverage shall provide space on any enrollment, renewal or 40 initial online portal process setup forms required of a subscriber or 41 applicant for coverage, excepting forms issued by the NY State of 42 Health, the official Health Plan Marketplace, other than those specif- 43 ically referenced in subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 44 five of section forty-three hundred ten and paragraph (v) of subdivision 45 one of section two hundred six of this chapter, so that the subscriber 46 or applicant for coverage shall register or decline registration in the 47 donate life registry for organ, eye and tissue donations under this 48 section of the enrollment or renewal form and that the following is 49 stated on the form in clear and conspicuous type: 50 "You must fill out the following section: Would you like to be added 51 to the Donate Life Registry? Check box for 'yes' or 'skip this ques- 52 tion'." 53 § 5. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 54 manner as chapter 758 of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 159 of 55 the laws of 2024, takes effect.